test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s9x30_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - stilla: # 
    stilla+V+Inf: stilla
    stilla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [stillir, stillar]
    stilla+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [stilti, stillaði]
    stilla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [stiltu, stillaðu]
    stilla+V+Sup: [stilt, stillað]
    stilla+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [stiltur, stillaður]
